inc/nouns.lexc
LEXICON AN_KINiyINFL  !!= * @CODE@ Special treatment for kinship nouns ending with -iy - should be done in twolc?
< "+N":î "+AN":m "+Sg":â 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > SG_ ; !generic form
< "+N":î "+AN":m "+Pl":â 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > PLak ; !generic form
+N+AN+Sg: ANiySUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl: ANiySUFF_PL ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:i2s%^DIMis%> AN_DIMPOSS ;  

LEXICON AN_DEP_INIT_M !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate possessive declension
< "+N":0 "+AN":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > ANABLGENERIC ; !Generic form 
+N+AN+Sg:%> ANSUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl:%> ANSUFF_PL ;

LEXICON ANABLGENERIC !!= * @CODE@ generic forms Sg, Pl, Loc and diminutives
+Sg: SG_ ;
+Pl: PLak ;
 LOC ;
+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>i2s%^DIM%> SG_ ;
+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>i2s%^DIM%> PLak ;


!! !!The declinations for Inanimates

LEXICON INimDECLw_ONESYLL_SG !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, stem -w, poss.-im-, dim. -is, only Sg
< "+N":o "+IN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; ! Adds -o
< "+N":w "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN+Sg:w%>i2m INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN:w%>i2m INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:w%> INimDIM-SG ;

LEXICON INimDECL !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, poss.-im-, dim. -is
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%>i2m INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%>i2m INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%>i2m INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%> INimDIM ;

LEXICON INimDECLisis !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, poss.-im-, dim. -isis
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%>i2m INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%>i2m INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%>i2m INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%> INimDIMisis ;


LEXICON IN_DECL !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, Dim: -is- and -isis-
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim+Use/NG:%>i2s%^DIMis%> IN_DIM ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%> IN_DIM ;

LEXICON IN_DECL_PL !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, plural Dim: -is- and -isis-
INABSDECL_PL ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim+Use/NG:%>i2s%^DIMis%> IN_DIM ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%> IN_DIM ;


LEXICON IN_DECLis !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, Dim: -is- 
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%> IN_DIM ;

LEXICON IN_DECLisis !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, Dim: -isis-
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIMis%> IN_DIM ;


LEXICON IN_DECL_OSI !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension of ôsi, an irregular noun
< "+N":s "+IN":i "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":s "+IN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
< "+N":s "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN+Sg:t%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:t%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:t%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:t%>i2s%^DIMis%> IN_DIM ; 


LEXICON IN_DIM !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate diminutives
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN: INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Sg: INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl: INSUFF_PL ;

LEXICON INABSDECL !!= * @CODE@ for inanimate absolute declension
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOCahk ; !

LEXICON INABSDECL_PL !!= * @CODE@ for inanimate absolute declension
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOCahk ; !


LEXICON INimDIM !!= * @CODE@ the diminutives with poss.-im-, Dim: -is
< "+N":i2 "+IN":s 0:%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN:i2m%^DIMis%> INSUFF_LOC ;
< "+N":i2 "+IN":s "+Sg":%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":i2 "+IN":s "+Pl":%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
+N+IN+Sg:i2m%^DIM%>is INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:i2m%^DIM%>is INSUFF_PL ;

LEXICON INimDIMisis !!= * @CODE@ the diminutives with poss.-im-, Dim: -isis
< "+N":i2 "+IN":s 0:%^DIM 0:i2 0:s "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN:i2m%^DIMis%> INSUFF_LOC ;
< "+N":i2 "+IN":s "+Sg":%^DIM 0:i2 0:s "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":i2 "+IN":s "+Pl":%^DIM  0:i2 0:s "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak ; !
+N+IN+Sg:i2m%^DIM%>is INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:i2m%^DIM%>is INSUFF_PL ;


LEXICON INimDIM-SG !!= * @CODE@ the diminutives with poss.-im-, Dim: -is
< "+N":i2 "+IN":s 0:%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN:i2m%^DIMis%> INSUFF_LOC ;
< "+N":i2 "+IN":s "+Sg":%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
+N+IN+Sg:i2m%^DIM%>is INSUFF_SG ;


!! LEXICON IN_DIMDECL Declensions inanimate diminutives, adding +Dim , not in use
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Sg":0 "+Dim":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  # ; !
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Pl":0 "+Dim":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Dim":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
!+N+IN+Sg+Dim:%> INSUFF_SG ;
!+N+IN+Pl+Dim:%> INSUFF_PL ;
!+N+IN+Dim:%> INSUFF_LOC ;

LEXICON INDEP-DERIV_M_SG !!= * @CODE@  for hardcoded noun:diminutive for inalienables
+N+IN+Der/Dim:  IN_DEP_INIT_M ;

LEXICON IN_DEP_INIT_M_PL !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate possessive declension, plural lemmas
IN_DEP_INIT_M ;

LEXICON IN_DEP_INIT_M !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate possessive declension
< "+N":0 "+IN":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > INABLGENERIC ; !Generic form 
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;


LEXICON INABLGENERIC !!= * @CODE@ generic forms Sg, Pl, Loc and diminutives
+Sg: SG_ ;
+Pl: PLa ;
 LOC ;
+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg:%>i2s%^DIM%> SG_ ;
+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl:%>i2s%^DIM%> PLa ;

LEXICON IN_DEP_INIT_M_DIM !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate possessive declension
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Sg":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > SG_ ; !Generic form 
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Pl":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > PLa ; !Generic form 
< "+N":0 "+IN":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > LOC ; 
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;


LEXICON IN_DEP_INIT_M_SG !!= * @CODE@ inanimate possessive declension, only Sg
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > # ; !Baseform for dep nouns OBS!
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;

!! !!Animate possessive suffixes

LEXICON ANSUFF_SG !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":0         "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Sg":0         "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Sg":0     "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
<"+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 

LEXICON ANSUFF_0POSS !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":0         "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Sg":0         "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Sg":0         "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
<"+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 

LEXICON SG_OBV !!= * @CODE@
  SG_ ;
  OBVIATIVE ;
  
  

LEXICON ANSUFF_Pl_0POSS !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":0 0:a  0:k       "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Sg":0 0:a  0:k      "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Sg":0       "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:â 0:n 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
<"+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:a 0:w 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w 0:a "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 


LEXICON ANSUFF_PL !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":0 0:a 0:k        "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Sg":0 0:a 0:k        "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Sg":0   "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:â 0:n 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
<"+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:a 0:w 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 

LEXICON PL_OBV !!= * @CODE@
  PLak ;
  OBVIATIVE ;



!LEXICON ANSUFF_LOC
!< "+Px1Sg":0         "@U.noun.1sg@"  > LOC ; !
!< "+Px2Sg":0         "@U.noun.2sg@"  > LOC ; !
!< "+Px3Sg":0         "@U.noun.3sg@"  > LOC ; !
!< "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y "@U.noun.4sg@" > LOC ; !
!< "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > LOCahk ;   ! 
!<"+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n "@U.noun.12pl@" > LOCahk ; ! 
!< "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > LOCahk ; !
!< "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > LOCahk ; !
!< "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y "@U.noun.4sg@" > LOC ; ! 




!! !!Inanimate possessive suffixes


LEXICON INSUFF_SG !!= * @CODE@ 
<  "+Px1Sg":0                  "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px2Sg":0                  "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px3Sg":0                  "@U.noun.3sg@"  > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px4Sg":0 0:2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px1Pl":0 0:2 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_ ;   ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":0 0:2 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_ ; ! inclusive Pl
<  "+Px2Pl":0 0:2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px3Pl":0 0:2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px4Pl":0 0:2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > SG_ ; !
            

LEXICON INSUFF_PL !!= * @CODE@ 
<  "+Px1Sg":0                   "@U.noun.1sg@"  > PLa ; !
<  "+Px2Sg":0                   "@U.noun.2sg@"  > PLa ; !
<  "+Px3Sg":0                   "@U.noun.3sg@"  > PLa ; !
<  "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w  "@U.noun.4sg@" > PLa ; !
<  "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:â 0:n  "@U.noun.1pl@"  > PLa ;   ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:a 0:w  "@U.noun.12pl@" > PLa ; ! inclusive Pl
<  "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w  "@U.noun.2pl@"  > PLa ; !
<  "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w  "@U.noun.3pl@"  > PLa ; !
<  "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w      "@U.noun.4sg@" > PLa ; ! obviative plural possessor



LEXICON INSUFF_LOC !!= * @CODE@
<  "+Px1Sg":0                  "@U.noun.1sg@"  > LOC ; !
<  "+Px2Sg":0                  "@U.noun.2sg@"  > LOC ; !
<  "+Px3Sg":0                  "@U.noun.3sg@"  > LOC ; !
<  "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y "@U.noun.4sg@" > LOC ; !
<  "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > LOCahk ;   ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n "@U.noun.12pl@" > LOCahk ; ! inclusive Pl
<  "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > LOCahk ; !
<  "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > LOCahk ; !
<  "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y "@U.noun.4sg@" > LOC ; ! obviative plural possessor


LEXICON ANiySUFF_SG  !!= * @CODE@
<  "+Px1Sg":0 0:i2 0:y                 "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px2Sg":0 0:i2 0:y                 "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px3Sg":0 0:i2 0:y                "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !The continuation lexicon adds an -a as a suffix to mark the obviative, since this is a 3-3 situation
<  "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !The continuation lexicon adds an -a as a suffix to mark the obviative, since this is a 3-3 situation
<  "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_ ; ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_ ; ! inclusive Pl
<  "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_ ; !
<  "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w    "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !The continuation lexicon adds an -a as a suffix to mark the obviative, since this is a 3-3 situation
<  "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w   "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! obviative plural possessor, requires final -a
